Delaware, session 153, HB322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1914, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1914. Arrest or detention by private person prohibited. (a) Except as set forth under subsection (b) of this section, arrest or detention by any person who is not specifically authorized by statute to effect an arrest or detention is prohibited. (b) (1) If a peace officer is attempting to effect an arrest or detention, a private citizen may assist upon request of a peace officer or if the peace officer is incapacitated. (2) A person employed by or providing security services for a health-care institution, as defined under Chapter 25C of Title 16, or a medical or dental practice licensed under Title 24 may, for the purpose of summoning a law-enforcement officer, take any person presenting a security or safety risk at such premises into custody and detain the person in a reasonable manner on the premises for a reasonable time.